Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-50 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Animal feeding operation” means the same as defined in


Section 20-41 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Homestead” means real property that includes the principal


residence of a person and up to four hundred (400) feet of

Req. No. 960 Page 1


surrounding land with any improvements, if all such real property is


both owned or leased by that person and is located outside a city or


town or outside any platted subdivision or addition;


3. “Intrusion” means operating an unmanned aircraft system at a


distance less than four hundred (400) feet above or alongside the


property. The distance shall be measured by the nearest point of a


property barrier or object within the property and the unmanned


aircraft system;


4. “Livestock” or “animals” means the same as defined in


Section 1-3 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. “Principal residence” means the place where a person


habitually lives for more days per year than another place in this


state, if the place is located outside a city or town or outside any


platted subdivision or addition;


6. “Secure farmstead area” means real property that includes an


animal feeding operation and up to four hundred (400) feet of


surrounding land with any improvements, if all such real property is


both owned or leased by a person and is located outside a city or


town or outside any platted subdivision or addition;


7. “Surveillance device” means a camera or electronic equipment


that transmits or records images, sounds, or data if the


transmission or recording is capable of reasonably identifying any


of the following:



Req. No. 960 Page 2


a. the identity, physical appearance, conduct, or voice


of an individual,


b. the species of an agricultural animal, or


c. the unique physical characteristics of land or an


improvement upon the land; and


8. “Unmanned aircraft system” means the same as defined in


Section 82 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-50.1 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person commits intrusion by the use of an unmanned


aircraft system if the person knowingly does any of the following:


1. Controls the flight of an unmanned aircraft system over a


homestead not owned or leased by the person piloting the unmanned


aircraft system and the unmanned aircraft system remains over the


homestead; or


2. Controls the flight of an unmanned aircraft system over a


secure farmstead area not owned or leased by the person piloting the


unmanned aircraft system and the unmanned aircraft system remains


over the secure farmstead area.


B. 1. A person who is convicted of violating this section


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for not


more than thirty (30) days, or by a fine not less than Five Hundred



Req. No. 960 Page 3


Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or


by both such imprisonment and fine.


2. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 1 of this


subsection, a person who is convicted of violating this section


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for


more than one (1) year, or by a fine not less than One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine if the person has


previously been convicted of any of the following:


a. violating the provisions of this section, or


b. surveillance by use of an unmanned aircraft system


pursuant to Section 3 of this act.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-50.2 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person commits surveillance by the use of an unmanned


aircraft system if the person knowingly does any of the following:


1. Controls the flight of an unmanned aircraft system equipped


with a surveillance device over a homestead not owned or leased by


the person piloting the unmanned aircraft system and the unmanned


aircraft system remains over the homestead; or


2. Controls the flight of an unmanned aircraft system equipped


with a surveillance device over a secure farmstead area not owned or



Req. No. 960 Page 4


leased by the person piloting the unmanned aircraft system and the


unmanned aircraft system remains over the secure farmstead area.


B. 1. A person who is convicted of violating this section


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for


more than one (1) year, or by a fine not less than One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00), or both such imprisonment and fine.


2. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 1 of this


subsection, a person who is convicted of violating this section


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for


more than two (2) years, or by a fine not less than Five Thousand


Dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00),


or by both such imprisonment and fine if the person has previously


been convicted of any of the following:


a. violating the provisions of Section 2 of this act, or


b. violating the provisions of this act.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-50.3 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person who is the owner or lessee of a homestead or secure


farmstead area may petition the district court to obtain an order


for a temporary injunction to prevent the respondent from using any


unmanned aircraft system equipped with a surveillance device, if a


preponderance of evidence indicates the respondent is harassing the

Req. No. 960 Page 5


petitioner by controlling the flight of the unmanned aircraft system


over the person’s homestead or secure farmstead area. The court


shall grant the temporary injunction for not more than two (2)


years. The court may continue the injunction upon a petition filed


by the petitioner with the court prior to the order’s expiration.


B. If a court grants an order for a temporary injunction under


subsection A of this section, the court may award the petitioner


court costs, reasonable attorney fees, and expenses related to the


petitioner’s investigation and adjudication of the case.


C. 1. Except as provided in subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of


this subsection, a court shall order that any person holding a


retrievable image, sound, or data recorded in violation of this


section destroy the image, sound, or data, including any copy of


such image, sound, or data.


2. a. A person may claim an ownership interest in a


retrievable image, sound, or data recorded in


violation of this section, to the extent that any of


the following apply:


(1) the person is an individual who may be identified


in the recording. A parent or guardian of the


individual may claim the ownership interest on


behalf of the individual,


(2) the person is an owner of the livestock that may


be identified in the recording, or

Req. No. 960 Page 6


(3) the person is an owner of the land or an


improvement to land having unique physical


characteristics that may be identified in the


recording.


b. A person cannot claim an ownership interest in a


retrievable image, sound, or data that may identify


another individual, livestock owned by another person,


or land or an improvement owned by another person,


unless that other individual or person consents.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-50.4 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person shall not be in violation of this act if the person


piloting the unmanned aircraft system is:


1. A person acting with the consent of the owner of the


homestead or secure farmstead area;


2. A person operating an unmanned aircraft system for a


commercial or agricultural use in compliance with the Federal


Aviation Administration regulations, authorizations, or exemptions;


3. A department, agency, or unit of government of this state or


any other state, city, county, or political subdivision, or any


other public corporation or agency created under the laws of this


state, any other state, the United States, or any department or


agency thereof, or any agency, commission, or authority established

Req. No. 960 Page 7


pursuant to an interstate company or agreement or combination


thereof;


4. A public utility as defined in Section 191.1 of Title 17 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. A railroad company as defined in Section 2201 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. The city, town, or political subdivision exercising rights


to a road pursuant to Section 1201 et seq. of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; and


7. The owner or lessee of the homestead or secure farmstead


area.


B. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this


act.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-960 MR 1/16/2025 3:07:13 PM















Req. No. 960 Page 8